test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-jiereeh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - jiereeh: # e-stems
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Nom: jiereeh
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Gen: jiereeh
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Acc: jiereeh
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Ill: jierehân
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Loc: jierehist
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Com: jiereháin
    jiereeh+N+Sg+Abe: jiereehttáá
    jiereeh+N+Ess: jierehin
    jiereeh+N+Par: jierehid
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Nom: jiereheh
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Gen: jierehij
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Acc: jierehijd
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Ill: jiereháid
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Loc: jierehijn
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Com: jierehijguin
    jiereeh+N+Pl+Abe: jierehijttáá

  Noun - veeskir: # 3-stavelse-stems
    veeskir+N+Sg+Nom: veeskir
    veeskir+N+Sg+Gen: veeskir
    veeskir+N+Sg+Acc: veeskir
    veeskir+N+Sg+Ill: veskirân
    veeskir+N+Sg+Loc: veskirist
    veeskir+N+Sg+Com: veskiráin
    veeskir+N+Sg+Abe: veeskirttáá
    veeskir+N+Ess:    veskirin
    veeskir+N+Par:    veskirid
    veeskir+N+Pl+Nom: veskireh
    veeskir+N+Pl+Gen: veskirij
    veeskir+N+Pl+Acc: veskirijd
    veeskir+N+Pl+Ill: veskiráid
    veeskir+N+Pl+Loc: veskirijn
    veeskir+N+Pl+Com: veskirijguin
    veeskir+N+Pl+Abe: veskirijttáá
